California, session 20252026, SB1308.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 9025.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:9025.5. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), all Members and designated employees of the Legislature shall, in conjunction with ethics training as specified in Section 8956, attend an orientation course regarding the United States Constitution and the California Constitution.(b) (1) If a Member of the Legislature assumes their seat after a regular session is convened, the Member shall attend the course within six months of assuming their seat.(2) If a designated employee of the Legislature is hired after a regular session is convened, the employee shall attend the course within six months of their date of hire.(c) The Legislative Counsel Bureau, in consultation with the Joint Rules Committee, shall develop and conduct the course described in subdivision (a). The course shall provide an orientation to relevant statutes and regulations, and address at a minimum the following topics: federalism, preemption, separation of powers, civil rights, the Bill of Rights, state constitutional rights and freedoms, and the roles and responsibilities of the three branches of government at the state and federal levels.(d) Members and designated employees of the Legislature may opt out of the course described in subdivision (a) if either of the following requirements are met:(1) The Member or employee demonstrates proficient knowledge of the topics described in subdivision (c) through an evaluation that is developed by the Legislative Counsel Bureau, in consultation with the Joint Rules Committee.(2) The Member or employee is licensed to practice law in the State of California.